Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-229.03
State trust company; merger or consolidation with a state bank; redemption of stock; when; value, how determined.

When the merger or consolidation becomes effective, the owner of shares of a trust company which were voted against a merger or consolidation with a state bank shall be entitled to receive the value of the stock in cash from the assets of the state trust company upon written demand made to the resulting state bank and trust company at any time within thirty days after the effective date of the merger or consolidation accompanied by the surrender of the stock certificates. The value of the shares shall be determined as of the date of the shareholders' meeting approving the merger or consolidation. An appraisal shall be conducted by three appraisers, one to be selected by the owners of two-thirds of the shares voting against the merger or consolidation, one by the board of directors of the resulting state bank and trust company, and the third by the two so chosen. If the appraisal is not completed within sixty days after the merger or consolidation becomes effective, the Department of Banking and Finance may cause an appraisal to be made and the resulting appraisal shall then govern. The expenses of the appraisal caused to be made by the department shall be paid by the resulting state bank and trust company.

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 48.